District of Columbia statutes.
31-760

Rulemaking.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 may issue rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-112, § 11, 45 DCR 1792
1981 Ed., § 35-3750.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-751.